hr-HR: Integrirano zaključavanje: Uključena brava za bicikl na nosač; Uključene brave za bicikl na nosač i nosač na vozilo; Ništa; Uključena brava za nosač na vozilo; Ostalo
ro-RO: Blocare integrată: Antifurt bicicletă-suport inclus; Antifurt bicicletă-suport și suport-vehicul incluse; Fără; Antifurt suport-vehicul inclus; Altele
es: Bloqueo integrado: Incluye bloqueo de bicicleta a soporte; Incluye bloqueos de bicicleta a soporte y de soporte a vehículo; Ninguno; Incluye bloqueo de soporte a vehículo; Otro
nb: Integrert låsing: Sykkel-til-stativ-lås inkludert; Både sykkel-til-stativ- og stativ-til-kjøretøy-låser inkludert; Ingen; Stativ-til-kjøretøy-lås inkludert; Annet
it: Lucchetto integrato: Lucchetto bici-portabici incluso; Lucchetti bici-portabici e portabici-veicolo inclusi; Nessuno; Lucchetto portabici-veicolo incluso; Altro
sl-SI: Integrirano zaklepanje: Vključena ključavnica za kolo na prtljažnik; Vključeni ključavnici za kolo na prtljažnik in za prtljažnik na vozilo; Brez; Vključena ključavnica za prtljažnik na vozilo; Drugo
pt-BR: Trava integrada: Trava de bicicleta para o rack incluída; Travas de bicicleta para o rack e de rack para o veículo incluídas; Nenhum; Trava do rack para o veículo incluída; Outra
pt-PT: Fechadura integrada: Cadeado de bicicleta para suporte incluído; Cadeados de bicicleta para suporte e de suporte para veículo incluídos; Nenhum; Cadeado de suporte para veículo incluído; Outro
bg-BG: Интегрирано заключване: Включена ключалка за велосипед към багажник; Включени ключалки за велосипед към багажник и за багажник към автомобил; Няма; Включена ключалка за багажник към автомобил; Други
en: Integrated locking: Bike-to-rack lock included; Both bike-to-rack and rack-to-vehicle locks included; None; Rack-to-vehicle lock included; Other
de: Integrierte Verriegelung: Schloss für Fahrrad am Träger inklusive; Schlösser für Fahrrad am Träger und Träger am Fahrzeug inklusive; Keine; Schloss für Träger am Fahrzeug inklusive; Sonstige
th: ระบบล็อคแบบบูรณาการ: รวมตัวล็อกจักรยานกับแร็ค; รวมทั้งตัวล็อกจักรยานกับแร็คและตัวล็อกแร็คกับรถ; ไม่มี; รวมตัวล็อกแร็คกับรถ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 內建鎖具: 包含自行車對車架鎖; 包含自行車對車架鎖與車架對車輛鎖; 無; 包含車架對車輛鎖; 其他
ru: Встроенная система запирания: В комплекте замок для крепления велосипеда к багажнику; В комплекте замки для крепления велосипеда к багажнику и багажника к автомобилю; Нет; В комплекте замок для крепления багажника к автомобилю; Другое
ko: 통합 잠금 장치: 자전거-랙 자물쇠 포함; 자전거-랙 및 랙-차량 자물쇠 모두 포함; 없음; 랙-차량 자물쇠 포함; 기타
nl: Geïntegreerde vergrendeling: Slot voor fiets aan drager inbegrepen; Zowel slot voor fiets aan drager als voor drager aan voertuig inbegrepen; Geen; Slot voor drager aan voertuig inbegrepen; Overig
tr: Entegre kilitleme sistemi: Bisiklet taşıyıcısı kilidi dahil; Hem bisiklet-taşıyıcı hem de taşıyıcı-araç kilidi dahil; Yok; Taşıyıcı-araç kilidi dahil; Diğer
lt-LT: Integruotas užraktas: Pridedamas dviračio prie laikiklio užraktas; Pridedami abu dviračio prie laikiklio ir laikiklio prie transporto priemonės užraktai; Nėra; Pridedamas laikiklio prie transporto priemonės užraktas; Kita
el: Ενσωματωμένο κλείδωμα: Περιλαμβάνεται κλειδαριά ποδηλάτου στη σχάρα; Περιλαμβάνονται κλειδαριές ποδηλάτου στη σχάρα και σχάρας στο όχημα; Κανένα; Περιλαμβάνεται κλειδαριά σχάρας στο όχημα; Άλλο
cs: Integrované zamykání: Včetně zámku k uzamčení kola k nosiči; Včetně zámků k uzamčení kola k nosiči i nosiče k vozidlu; Žádné; Včetně zámku k uzamčení nosiče k vozidlu; Jiné
fi: Integroitu lukitus: Sisältää pyörän ja telineen välisen lukon; Sisältää lukot pyörän ja telineen sekä telineen ja ajoneuvon väliin; Ei mitään; Sisältää telineen ja ajoneuvon välisen lukon; Muu
vi: Khóa tích hợp: Kèm theo khóa xe với giá đỡ; Kèm khóa xe với giá đỡ và khóa giá đỡ với xe; Không có; Kèm theo khóa giá đỡ với xe; Khác
sv: Integrerad låsning: Lås för cykel till ställ ingår; Lås för både cykel till ställ och ställ till fordon ingår; Inget; Lås för ställ till fordon ingår; Annat
fr: Verrouillage intégré: Antivol vélo-porte-vélos inclus; Antivols vélo-porte-vélos et porte-vélos-véhicule inclus; Aucun; Antivol porte-vélos-véhicule inclus; Autre
da: Integreret lås: Lås fra cykel til stativ medfølger; Både lås fra cykel til stativ og lås fra stativ til køretøj medfølger; Ingen; Lås fra stativ til køretøj medfølger; Andet
ja: 一体ロック: 自転車とラックのロック（付属）; 自転車とラックのロック、およびラックと車両のロック（両方付属）; なし; ラックと車両のロック（付属）; その他
hu: Integrált zár: Kerékpárt a tartóhoz rögzítő zár mellékelve; Kerékpárt a tartóhoz és tartót a járműhöz rögzítő zár is mellékelve; Nincs; Tartót a járműhöz rögzítő zár mellékelve; Egyéb
pl: Zintegrowane zamykanie: Blokada roweru do bagażnika w zestawie; Blokada roweru do bagażnika i bagażnika do pojazdu w zestawie; Brak; Blokada bagażnika do pojazdu w zestawie; Inne
zh-CN: 集成锁具: 包含自行车到支架锁; 包含自行车到支架和支架到车辆锁; 无; 包含支架到车辆锁; 其他
sk-SK: Integrované zamykanie: Vrátane zámku bicykla k nosiču; Vrátane zámkov bicykla k nosiču aj nosiča k vozidlu; Žiadne; Vrátane zámku nosiča k vozidlu; Iné